Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.195

Work-integrated learning matching grant program.

(1)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract with a statewide nonprofit organization with expertise in promoting and supporting work-integrated learning from early learning through postsecondary education to establish a matching grant program to fund projects implemented by local applicant schools identified in RCW 28A.630.135.

(b) The matching grant program shall include the following minimum requirements for local applicant schools:

(i) Measurable and accountable focus on low-income youth, homeless youth, and youth of color;

(ii) Accountability for increasing registered youth apprenticeships, internships, mentors, career planning, and other work-integrated learning experiences;

(iii) Regional coordinators or liaisons to facilitate links between schools, higher education institutions, business, labor, and the community in developing internships and other work-integrated learning experiences; and

(iv) Systemwide support for work-integrated learning experiences, including but not limited to career awareness, career explorations, career counseling, and career preparation and training.

(2)(a) Grant funds awarded in accordance with this section may be expended only to the extent that they are equally matched by private sector cash contributions for the program. Grantees must provide reports to the work-integrated learning advisory committee in accordance with RCW 28A.300.196.

(b) By November 15, 2020, and yearly thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide an evaluation to the governor and the education and economic development committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

[ 2018 c 206 s 2.]